Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1546.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.321, subdivision 14, is amended to read: Subd. 14. Prior qualified human trafficking-related offense. A "prior qualified human trafficking-related offense" means a new text begin previous new text end conviction or delinquency adjudication deleted text begin within the ten years from the discharge from probation or parole immediately preceding the current offensedeleted text end for a violation of or an attempt to violate section 609.322, subdivision 1 (solicitation, inducement, and promotion of prostitution; sex trafficking in the first degree); 609.322, subdivision 1a (solicitation, inducement, and promotion of prostitution; sex trafficking in the second degree); 609.282 (labor trafficking); deleted text begin ordeleted text end 609.283 (unlawful conduct with respect to documents in furtherance of labor or sex trafficking)new text begin ; or a statute from another state or the United States in conformity with any of these offensesnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end